Utah statutes.
32B-6-604.   Specific licensing requirements for an on-premise banquet license.

(1)  To obtain an on-premise banquet license a person shall comply with Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process.

(2) (a)  An on-premise banquet license expires on October 31 of each year.

(b)  To renew a person's on-premise banquet license, a person shall comply with the requirements of Chapter 5, Part 2, Retail Licensing Process, by no later than September 30.

(3) (a)  The nonrefundable application fee for an on-premise banquet license is $300.

(b)  The initial license fee for an on-premise banquet license is $750.

(c)  The renewal fee for an on-premise banquet license is $750.

(4)  The bond amount required for an on-premise banquet license is the penal sum of $10,000.

(5)  Notwithstanding the other provisions of this part, if an applicant is a state agency or political subdivision of the state it is not required to:

(a)  pay an application fee, initial license fee, or renewal fee;

(b)  obtain the written consent of the local authority;

(c)  submit a copy of the applicant's current business license; or

(d)  post a bond as specified by Section 32B-5-204.

(6)  Notwithstanding Subsection 32B-5-303(3), the department may approve an additional location in or on the licensed premises of an on-premise banquet licensee from which the on-premise banquet licensee may store, sell, offer for sale, furnish, or allow the consumption of an alcoholic product that is not included in its original application only:

(a)  upon proper application by an on-premise banquet licensee; and

(b)  in accordance with guidelines approved by the commission.

